Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 1. Organization

§ 10-3-101.
Creation; composition; appointment; term; removal; qualifications; vacancies; compensation; office; acceptance of grants.

The commission is created to consist of eight (8) commissioners. Seven (7) commissioners shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the consent of the senate, each to serve for a term of six (6) years not to exceed two (2) terms. Two (2) commissioners shall be appointed at-large for a term of six (6) years. The director of the department shall serve as an ex officio and eighth member of the commission but shall not vote on matters before the commission. The governor may remove any appointed commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

One (1) commissioner shall be appointed from each of the following districts:

District 1. Counties of Laramie, Albany, Platte and Goshen;

District 2. Counties of Carbon, Sweetwater, Uinta, Lincoln, Sublette and Teton;

District 3. Counties of Niobrara, Converse, Natrona and Fremont;

District 4. Counties of Hot Springs, Washakie, Big Horn and Park; and

District 5. Counties of Sheridan, Johnson, Campbell, Crook and Weston.

If any commissioner ceases to be a resident of the district from which he is appointed, his office shall be vacant. All vacancies from any cause shall be filled by appointment by the governor as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

.

Each of the commissioners shall qualify by taking the constitutional oath of office and each shall act without pay except that he may receive his actual traveling expenses according to law.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 4.

The department may receive on behalf of the state all grants of money, property or other things of value from the federal government, the state of Wyoming or other public agency or person.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The commission shall meet as necessary to properly exercise its functions, but shall meet not less than quarterly to consider the distribution of grants under W.S.

10-3-401

and provide information and recommendations based upon existing airport planning priorities to the state loan and investment board for actions on loan applications under W.S. 16-1-109(d)(vi).

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 64, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 33-101; Laws 1957, ch. 226, § 2; ch. 254, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 10-15; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 23; 1965, ch. 115, § 24; 1967, ch. 181, § 22; 1969, ch. 168, § 13; 1971, ch. 27, § 2; ch. 190, § 5; W.S. 1977, §

10-2-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 61, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, §§ 3, 4; 2003, ch. 104, § 1; 2013 ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

For constitutional oath of office, see art. VI, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

As to per diem allowance and expenses for state officers or employees, see §

9-3-102

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (h), substituted “grants under W.S.

10-3-401

” for “grants and loans under W.S.

10-3-401

and

10-3-403

” and added the language beginning “provide information and recommendations.”

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “Not more than four (4) members of the commission shall be of the same political party” at the beginning of (d).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “16-1-109(d)(vi)” for “9-12-703” at the end of (h).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Level Transportation Management,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 701 (1971).